District of Columbia statutes.
42-2702.04

Conflict of interest; disclosure; waiver of bar against participation by interested party.

Any member, officer, or employee of the Agency who is interested either directly or indirectly, or who is an officer or employee of, or has an ownership interest in any firm or agency interested directly or indirectly in any transaction with the Agency including, but not limited to, any loan to any sponsor, builder or developer, shall disclose this interest to the Agency. This interest shall be set forth in the minutes of the Agency, and the member, officer, or employee having the interest shall not participate on behalf of the Agency in the authorization or implementation of any such transaction. The Board by two-thirds majority vote may allow a waiver of a member’s, officer’s or employee’s inability to participate in circumstances where the interest falls within guidelines adopted as rules promulgated by the Board.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-135, § 204, 25 DCR 5008
Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-28, § 2(h), 28 DCR 2848
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-247, § 2(e), 46 DCR 1100
1981 Ed., § 45-2114.
1973 Ed., § 45-1906.